Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-606
Department of Health and Human Services; hospitals of federal government; lack of control.

Nothing in sections 80-601 to 80-606 shall be construed as conferring upon the Department of Health and Human Services or other agency or officer of this state any power of licensing, supervision, inspection, or control over hospitals or other institutions operated by the United States Government or over the officers or employees therein.

Laws 1947, c. 307, § 6, p. 939;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 834.